trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="pede/apsă__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>apsă</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>apsa</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>pse</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>psei</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>pse</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>psele</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>pse</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>pselor</l>
	  <r>apsă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 <pardef n="întreb/are__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>are</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>area</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ări</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ării</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ări</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ările</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ări</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ărilor</l>
	  <r>are<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<pardef n="c/arne__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>arne</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>arnea</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ărni</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ărnii</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ărnuri</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ărnurile</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ărnuri</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ărnurilor</l>
	  <r>arne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<pardef n="ge/antă__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>antă</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>anta</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>nți</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>nții</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>nți</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>nțile</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>nți</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>nților</l>
	  <r>antă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="universit/ate__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>atea</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ăți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ății</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ăți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ățile</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>ăți</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ăților</l>
	  <r>ate<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<pardef n="fericir/e__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ii</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ile</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ilor</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="tandreț/e__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ei</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>uri</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>urile</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>uri</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>urilor</l>
	  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

      <e lm="antichitate">
        <i>antichit</i>
        <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="disponibilitate">
        <i>disponibilit</i>
        <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="individualitate">
        <i>individualit</i>
        <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="naționalitate">
        <i>naționalit</i>
        <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="umanitate">
        <i>umanit</i>
        <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="carne">
        <i>c</i>
        <par n="c/arne__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="geantă" a="delnou">
        <i>ge</i>
        <par n="ge/antă__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="afumare">
        <i>afum</i>
        <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="acceptare">
        <i>accept</i>
        <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="deplasare">
        <i>deplas</i>
        <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="iluminare">
        <i>ilumin</i>
        <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="îndrumare" r="LR">
        <i>îndrum</i>
        <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="pedeapsă">
        <i>pede</i>
        <par n="pede/apsă__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="tandrețe">
        <i>tandreț</i>
        <par n="tandreț/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="aerisire">
        <i>aerisir</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="conducere">
        <i>conducer</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="folosire">
        <i>folosir</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="margine">
        <i>margin</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="pasiune">
        <i>pasiun</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tinerețe">
        <i>tinereț</i>
        <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
      </e>
     <e lm="desconsiderare" a="delnou">
      <i>desconsider</i>
      <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
    </e>
<e lm="lucrare" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>lucr</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="relativitate" a="delia">
  <i>relativit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="contaminare" a="delia">
  <i>contamin</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="mediere" a="delia">
  <i>medier</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="nervozitate" a="delia">
  <i>nervozit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="intenționalitate" a="mioara">
  <i>intenționalit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="inventivitate" a="mioara">
  <i>inventivit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="anterioritate" a="mioara">
  <i>anteriorit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="criminalitate" a="mioara">
  <i>criminalit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="univocitate" a="mioara">
  <i>univocit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="absurditate" a="mangheluta">
  <i>absurdit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="tensiune" a="delia">
  <i>tensiun</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="sațietate" a="delia">
  <i>sațiet</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="reurbanizare" a="delia">
  <i>reurbaniz</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="usturime" a="delia">
  <i>usturim</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="prăbușire" a="delia">
  <i>prăbușir</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="ostilitate" a="delia">
  <i>ostilit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="oferire" a="delnou">
  <i>oferir</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="întrepătrundere" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>întrepătrunder</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="încălcare" a="delia">
  <i>încălc</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="hipersensibilitate" a="delia">
  <i>hipersensibilit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="finețe" a="delia">
  <i>fineț</i>
  <par n="tandreț/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="acuratețe" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>acurateț</i>
  <par n="tandreț/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="deznădejde" a="delia">
  <i>deznădejd</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="defilare" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>defil</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="captivitate" a="delia">
  <i>captivit</i>
  <par n="universit/ate__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="refacere" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>refacer</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="formațiune" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>formațiun</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="vechime" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>vechim</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="digresiune" a="mioara">
  <i>digresiun</i>
  <par n="fericir/e__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="excavare" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>excav</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="reprobare" a="mioara">
  <i>reprob</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="permutare" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>permut</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="naturalizare" a="mioara">
  <i>naturaliz</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="centrare" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>centr</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="dezinformare" a="delnou">
  <i>dezinform</i>
  <par n="întreb/are__n"/>
</e>
